Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.556

Early learning program—Funding and statewide implementation.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5752-S.SL) ***

(1) Funding for the program of early learning established under this chapter must be appropriated to the department. The department shall distribute funding to approved early childhood education and assistance program contractors on the basis of eligible children enrolled.

(2) The program shall be implemented in phases, so that full implementation is achieved in the 2026-27 school year.

(3) Funding shall continue to be phased in each year until full statewide implementation of the early learning program is achieved in the 2026-27 school year, at which time any eligible child is entitled to be enrolled in the program. Entitlement under this section is voluntary enrollment.

(4) School districts and approved community-based early learning providers may contract with the department to provide services under the program. The department shall collaborate with school districts, community-based providers, and educational service districts to promote an adequate supply of approved providers.

[ 2021 c 199 s 208; 2019 c 408 s 3; 2017 3rd sp.s. c 22 s 1; 2015 3rd sp.s. c 7 s 12; 2015 c 128 s 4; 2010 c 231 s 4. Formerly RCW 43.215.456, 43.215.142.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2021 c 199 ss 204-208: See note following RCW 43.216.513.

Short title—Findings—Intent—Conflict with federal requirements—2021 c 199: See notes following RCW 43.216.770.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 408: See note following RCW 43.216.512.

Finding—Intent—2015 3rd sp.s. c 7: See note following RCW 43.216.085.